Washington statutes.
RCW 43.71.130

State health care affordability account.

(1) The state health care affordability account is created in the state treasury. Expenditures from the account may only be used for premium and cost-sharing assistance programs established in RCW 43.71.110.

(2) The following funds must be deposited in the account:

(a) Any grants, donations, or contributions of money collected for purposes of the premium assistance or cost-sharing reduction programs established in RCW 48.43.795;

(b) Any federal funds received by the health benefit exchange pursuant to RCW 43.71.120; and

(c) Any additional funding specifically appropriated to the account.

[ 2021 c 246 s 3.]